Georgia, session 2025_26, HB323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Bridging the Gap for ALS and Chronic
Kidney Disease Act of 2025."
H. B. 323
- 1 -

LC 46 1064
SECTION 2.
Chapter 43 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to Medicare
supplement insurance, is amended by revising Code Section 33-43-3, relating to duplicate
benefits prohibited and establishment of standards, as follows:
"33-43-3.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term '42 U.S.C. Section 426(b) or 421-1' means such
federal law as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(a)(b) No medicare Medicare supplement insurance policy or certificate in force in this
state shall contain benefits which duplicate benefits provided by medicare Medicare.
(b)(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of Georgia law, a medicare Medicare
supplement policy or certificate shall not exclude or limit benefits for losses incurred more
than six months from the effective date of coverage because it involved a preexisting
condition. The policy or certificate shall not define a preexisting condition more
restrictively than a condition for which medical advice was given or treatment was
recommended by or received from a physician within six months before the effective date
of coverage.
(c)(d) The Commissioner shall adopt reasonable regulations to establish specific standards
for policy provisions of medicare Medicare supplement policies and certificates. Such
standards shall be in addition to and in accordance with applicable laws of this state. No
requirement of this title relating to minimum required policy benefits, other than the
minimum standards contained in this chapter, shall apply to medicare Medicare supplement
policies and certificates. The standards shall cover, but shall not be limited to:
(1) Terms of renewability;
(2) Initial and subsequent conditions of eligibility;
(3) Nonduplication of coverage;
(4) Probationary periods;
(5) Benefit limitations, exceptions, and reductions;
H. B. 323
- 2 -

LC 46 1064
(6) Elimination periods;
(7) Requirements for replacement;
(8) Recurrent conditions; and
(9) Definitions of terms.
(d)(e) The Commissioner shall adopt reasonable regulations to establish minimum
standards for benefits, claims payment, marketing practices, compensation arrangements,
and reporting practices for medicare Medicare supplement policies and certificates.
(e)(f) The Commissioner may adopt from time to time such reasonable regulations as are
necessary to conform medicare Medicare supplement policies and certificates to the
requirements of federal law and regulations promulgated thereunder, including, but not
limited to:
(1) Requiring refunds or credits if the policies or certificates do not meet loss ratio
requirements;
(2) Establishing a uniform methodology for calculating and reporting loss ratios;
(3) Assuring public access to policies, premiums, and loss ratio information of issuers
of medicare Medicare supplement insurance;
(4) Establishing a process for approving or disapproving policy forms, certificate forms,
and proposed premium increases;
(5) Establishing a policy for holding public hearings prior to approval of premium
increases; and
(6) Establishing standards for medicare Medicare select policies and certificates.
(f)(g) The Commissioner may adopt reasonable regulations that specify prohibited policy
provisions not otherwise specifically authorized by statute which, in the opinion of the
Commissioner, are unjust, unfair, or unfairly discriminatory to any person individual
insured or proposed to be insured under a medicare Medicare supplement policy or
certificate.
H. B. 323
- 3 -

LC 46 1064
(g)(h) Insurers offering medicare Medicare supplement policies in this state to persons for
individuals 65 years of age or older shall also offer medicare Medicare supplement policies
to persons for individuals in this state who are eligible for and enrolled in medicare
Medicare by reason of disability or end-stage end stage renal disease, as specified under
42 U.S.C. Section 426(b) or 426-1. Such Medicare supplement policies shall be issued on
a guaranteed renewable basis under which the insurer shall be required to continue
coverage so long as premiums are paid on such policy. Except as otherwise provided in
this Code section, all benefits, protections, policies, and procedures that apply to persons
individuals 65 years of age or older shall also apply to persons individuals who are eligible
for and enrolled in medicare Medicare by reason of disability or end-stage end stage renal
disease, as specified under 42 U.S.C. Section 426(b) or 426-1.
(h)(i) Persons may enroll in a medicare Medicare supplement policy at any time authorized
or required by the federal government or within six months of:
(1) Enrolling in medicare Medicare Part B for an individual who is under 65 years of age
and is eligible for medicare Medicare because by reason of disability or end-stage end
stage renal disease, as specified under 42 U.S.C. Section 426(b) or 426-1, whichever is
later;
(2) Receiving notice that such person individual has been retroactively enrolled in
medicare Medicare Part B due to a retroactive eligibility decision made by the Social
Security Administration; or
(3) Experiencing a qualifying event identified in regulations adopted pursuant to
subsection (c) of this Code section.
(j) Beginning January 1, 2026, in addition to the provisions in subsection (i) of this Code
section, an individual may enroll in a Medicare supplement policy when such individual
is currently enrolled in Medicare by reason of disability or end stage renal disease, as
specified under 42 U.S.C. Section 426(b) or 426-1, during a one-time open enrollment
period of six months beginning on January 1, 2026.
H. B. 323
- 4 -

LC 46 1064
(i)(k) No policy or certificate issued pursuant to this chapter shall prohibit payment made
by third parties on behalf of individual applicants or individuals within a group applicant
so long as:
(1) The third party is an immediate family member of a person lawfully exercising an
in-force power of attorney or legal guardianship; or
(2) The third party is a nonprofit, charitable organization that:
(A) Is the named requestor of an advisory opinion issued by the United States
100 Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) Office of Inspector General under
101 the requirements of 42 C.F.R. Part 1008; and
102 (B) Provides, upon request by the medicare Medicare supplement issuer, the specific
103 advisory opinion relied upon by the third party to make such payment and a written
104 certification that the advisory opinion is in full force and effect and has not been
105 rescinded, modified, or terminated by the United States Department of Health and
106 Human Services (HHS) Office of Inspector General.
107 (j) Premiums for medicare supplemental insurance policies may differ between persons
108 who qualify for medicare who are 65 years of age or older and those who qualify for
109 medicare who are younger than 65 years of age; provided, however, that such differences
110 in premiums shall not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory and shall be
111 based on sound actuarial principles and reasonable in relation to the benefits provided.
112 (l) An insurer shall not charge premium rates for a standardized Plan A, Plan B, or Plan D
113 Medicare supplement policy or certificate for an individual under sixty-five years of age
114 who becomes eligible for Medicare by reason of disability or end stage renal disease, as
115 specified under 42 U.S.C. Section 426(b) or 426-1, that exceed premium rates charged for
116 such policies to an individual who is 65 years of age.
117 (m) An insurer shall not charge premium rates for any standardized lettered Medicare
118 supplement policy or certificate other than those specified in subsection (l) of this Code
119 section for an individual under 65 years of age who becomes eligible for Medicare by
H. B. 323
- 5 -

LC 46 1064
120 reason of disability or end stage renal disease, as specified under 42 U.S.C. Section 426(b)
121 or 426-1, that exceed 200 percent of the premium rates charged for such policy or
122 certificate to an individual who is 65 years of age or issue to an individual under 65 years
123 of age who becomes eligible for Medicare by reason of disability or end stage renal
124 disease, as specified under 42 U.S.C. Section 426(b) or 426-1, a Medicare supplement
125 policy or certificate that contains a waiting period or a preexisting condition limitation or
126 exclusion."
127 SECTION 3.
128 For purposes of rule making, this Act shall become effective upon its approval by the
129 Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval. For all other purposes, this Act
130 shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
131 SECTION 4.
132 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 323
- 6 -